Florida, session 2026, HB6513.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
166
167 Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
168 are found and declared to be true.
169 Section 2. The City of Clearwater is authorized and
170 directed to appropriate from funds not otherwise encumbered and
171 to draw a warrant in the sum of $16,037,182.49, plus post-
172 judgment interest at the rate of 9.46 percent annually, as
173 agreed to by the parties and to be calculated by the trial
174 court, payable to Maximus Giannikos as compensation for injuries
175 and damages sustained due to the negligence of the City of
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6513-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6513 2026
176 Clearwater.
177 Section 3. The amount paid by the City of Clearwater
178 pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded
179 under this act are intended to provide the sole compensation for
180 all present and future claims arising out of the factual
181 situation described in this act which resulted in injuries and
182 damages to Maximus Giannikos. The total amount paid for attorney
183 fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent of the
184 total amount awarded under this act.
185 Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6513-00